incubator/apertium-ru-uk.uk.dix
    <pardef n="чи/й__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>й</l>
          <r>й<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>й</l>
          <r>й<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>я</l>
          <r>й<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>є</l>
          <r>й<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ї</l>
          <r>й<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ї</l>
          <r>й<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ї</l>
          <r>й<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ї</l>
          <r>й<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>його</l>
          <r>й<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>його</l>
          <r>й<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>єї</l>
          <r>й<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>його</l>
          <r>й<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>їх</l>
          <r>й<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>їх</l>
          <r>й<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>їх</l>
          <r>й<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>їх</l>
          <r>й<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>єму</l>
          <r>й<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>єму</l>
          <r>й<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>їй</l>
          <r>й<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>єму</l>
          <r>й<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>їм</l>
          <r>й<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>їм</l>
          <r>й<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>їм</l>
          <r>й<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>їм</l>
          <r>й<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>його</l>
          <r>й<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>й</l>
          <r>й<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ию</l>
          <r>й<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>е</l>
          <r>й<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>їх</l>
          <r>й<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ї</l>
          <r>й<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ї</l>
          <r>й<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ї</l>
          <r>й<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>їм</l>
          <r>й<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>їм</l>
          <r>й<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>їй</l>
          <r>й<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>їм</l>
          <r>й<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>їми</l>
          <r>й<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>їми</l>
          <r>й<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>їми</l>
          <r>й<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>їми</l>
          <r>й<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>йому</l>
          <r>й<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>йому</l>
          <r>й<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>їй</l>
          <r>й<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>йому</l>
          <r>й<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>їх</l>
          <r>й<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>їх</l>
          <r>й<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>їх</l>
          <r>й<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>їх</l>
          <r>й<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>й</l>
          <r>й<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>й</l>
          <r>й<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>я</l>
          <r>й<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>є</l>
          <r>й<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ї</l>
          <r>й<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ї</l>
          <r>й<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ї</l>
          <r>й<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ї</l>
          <r>й<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>

    <e lm="чий"><i>чи</i><par n="чи/й__det"/></e>
